Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.010

School buildings, maintenance, furnishing, and insuring—School building security.

(1) Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall:

(a) Cause all school buildings to be properly heated, lighted, and ventilated and maintained in a clean and sanitary condition; and

(b) Maintain and repair, furnish, and insure such school buildings.

(2) Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall also:

(a) Consider installing a perimeter security control mechanism or system on all school campuses, as appropriate to the design of the campus; and

(b) For new school construction projects or remodeling projects of more than forty percent of an existing school building that are initiated after July 28, 2013, consider school building plans and designs that promote:

(i) An optimal level of security for the specific school site that incorporates evolving technology and best practices to protect students and staff in the event of a threat during school hours;

(ii) Direct control and observation of the public entering school grounds; and

(iii) The public entering school grounds through as few entrances as possible, such as through the main entrance of a school's administrative offices.

(3) The purpose of subsection (2) of this section is to promote generally the safety of all students and staff in Washington public schools. Nothing in subsection (2) of this section creates any civil liability for school districts, or creates a new cause of action or new theory of negligence against a school district board of directors, a school district, or the state.

[ 2013 c 233 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.102. Prior: 1969 c 53 s 1, part; 1967 ex.s. c 29 s 1, part; 1967 c 12 s 1, part; 1965 ex.s. c 49 s 1, part; 1963 c 104 s 1, part; 1963 c 5 s 1, part; 1961 c 305 s 1, part; 1961 c 237 s 1, part; 1961 c 66 s 1, part; 1955 c 68 s 2, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.102, 28.58.100(3), part, and (4) part.]

NOTES:

School district funds: RCW 28A.320.330.